Utah statutes.
78B-6-1206.   Service by publication.

If a party having a share or interest is unknown, or any one of the known parties resides out of the state or cannot be found, the summons may be served upon them by publication in accordance with the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

